Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2890.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; Ganado unified school district; safety, maintenance and renovation projects The sum of $12,772,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to distribute to the Ganado unified school district of the Navajo Nation for safety, maintenance and renovation projects in the Ganado unified school district in the following amounts: 1. District fire alarm system.                       $ 6,000,000 2. District HVAC replacement.                        $ 6,000,000 3. District vape sensors.                            $ 20,000 4. Transportation second floor exit.                 $ 12,000 5. Ganado high school flooring.                      $  250,000 6. Ganado primary school flooring.                   $  250,000 7. Ganado primary school outside stairs.             $  240,000